Florida, session 2026, SB1492.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 12 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 14 (1) 15 (b)âAll materials used to teach reproductive health or any 16 disease, including HIV/AIDS, its symptoms, development, and 17 treatment, as part of the courses referenced in subsection (5), 18 must be approved annually by a district school board in an open, 19 noticed public meeting the department. 20 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.